Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.418

Dividends.

Dividends may be paid from current undivided earnings which remain after deduction of expenses and the amounts required for reserves, or from the undivided earnings that remain from preceding periods.

[ 2015 c 123 s 3; 1997 c 397 s 33; 1984 c 31 s 50. Formerly RCW 31.12.485.]